California statutes. Fish and Game Code
(2) Nothing in Section 2021 prohibits the sale or possession of a shark carcass, skin, or fin for taxidermy purposes pursuant to Section 3087.

(b) (1) The Ocean Protection Council shall submit an annual report to the
 Legislature that lists any shark species that have been independently certified to meet internationally accepted standards for sustainable seafood, as defined in Section 35550 of the Public Resources Code, and adopted by the Ocean Protection Council pursuant to Section 35617 of the Public Resources Code, including chain of custody standards.

(2) A report to be submitted pursuant to paragraph (1) shall be submitted in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 132, Sec. 36.   (AB 1760)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

2022.

(a) For the purposes of this section, the following terms have the following meanings:

(1) “Bona fide educational or scientific institution” means an institution that establishes through documentation either of the following:

(A) Educational or scientific tax exemption, from the federal Internal Revenue Service or the institution’s national, state, or local tax authority.

(B) Accreditation as an educational or scientific institution, from a qualified national, regional, state, or local authority for the institution’s location.

(2) “Ivory” means a tooth or tusk from a species
 of elephant, hippopotamus, mammoth, mastodon, walrus, warthog, whale, or narwhal, or a piece thereof, whether raw ivory or worked ivory, and includes a product containing, or advertised as containing, ivory.

(3) “Rhinoceros horn” means the horn, or a piece thereof, or a derivative such as powder, of a species of rhinoceros, and includes a product containing, or advertised as containing, a rhinoceros horn.

(4) “Sale” or “sell” means selling, trading, bartering for monetary or nonmonetary consideration, giving away in conjunction with a commercial transaction, or giving away at a location where a commercial transaction occurred at least once during the same or the previous calendar year.

(5) “Total value” means either the fair market value or the actual price paid for ivory or rhinoceros horn, whichever is greater.

(b) Except as provided in subdivision (c), it is unlawful to purchase, sell, offer for sale, possess with intent to sell, or import with intent to sell ivory or rhinoceros horn.

(c) The prohibitions set forth in subdivision (b) do not apply to any of the following:

(1) An employee or agent of the federal or state government undertaking a law enforcement activity pursuant to federal or state law, or a mandatory duty required by federal law.

(2) An activity that is authorized by an exemption or permit under federal law or that is otherwise expressly authorized under federal law.

(3) Ivory or rhinoceros horn that is part of a musical instrument, including, but not limited to, a string or wind
 instrument or piano, and that is less than 20 percent by volume of the instrument, if the owner or seller provides historical documentation demonstrating provenance and showing the item was manufactured no later than 1975.

(4) Ivory or rhinoceros horn that is part of a bona fide antique and that is less than five percent by volume of the antique, if the antique status is established by the owner or seller of the antique with historical documentation demonstrating provenance and showing the antique to be not less than 100 years old.

(5) The purchase, sale, offer for sale, possession with intent to sell, or importation with intent to sell ivory or rhinoceros horn for educational or scientific purposes by a bona fide educational or scientific institution if both of the following criteria are satisfied:

(A) The purchase,
 sale, offer for sale, possession with intent to sell, or import with intent to sell the ivory or rhinoceros horn is not prohibited by federal law.

(B) The ivory or rhinoceros horn was legally acquired before January 1, 1991, and was not subsequently transferred from one person to another for financial gain or profit after July 1, 2016.

(d) Possession of ivory or rhinoceros horn in a retail or wholesale outlet commonly used for the buying or selling of similar items is prima facie evidence of possession with intent to sell. This evidence does not preclude a finding of intent to sell based on any other evidence that may serve to establish that intent independently or in conjunction with this evidence.

(e) For a violation of any provision of this section, or any rule, regulation, or order adopted pursuant to this
 section, the following criminal penalties shall be imposed:

(1) For a first conviction, where the total value of the ivory or rhinoceros horn is two hundred fifty dollars ($250) or less, the offense shall be a misdemeanor punishable by a fine of not less than one thousand dollars ($1,000), or more than ten thousand dollars ($10,000), imprisonment in the county jail for not more than 30 days, or by both the fine and imprisonment.

(2) For a first conviction, where the total value of the ivory or rhinoceros horn is more than two hundred fifty dollars ($250), the offense shall be a misdemeanor punishable by a fine of not less than five thousand dollars ($5,000), or more than forty thousand dollars ($40,000), imprisonment in the county jail for not more than one year, or by both the fine and imprisonment.

(3) For a second
 or subsequent conviction, where the total value of the ivory or rhinoceros horn is two hundred fifty dollars ($250) or less, the offense shall be a misdemeanor punishable by a fine of not less than five thousand dollars ($5,000), or more than forty thousand dollars ($40,000), imprisonment in county jail for not more than one year, or by both the fine and imprisonment.

(4) For a second or subsequent conviction, where the total value of the ivory or rhinoceros horn is more than two hundred fifty dollars ($250), the offense shall be a misdemeanor punishable by a fine of not less than ten thousand dollars ($10,000), or more than fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) or the amount equal to two times the total value of the ivory or rhinoceros horn involved in the violation, whichever is greater, imprisonment in county jail for not more than one year, or by both the fine and imprisonment.

(f) In addition to, and separate from, any criminal penalty provided for under subdivision (e), an administrative penalty of up to ten thousand dollars ($10,000) may be imposed for a violation of any provision of this section, or any rule, regulation, or order adopted pursuant to this section. Penalties authorized pursuant to this subdivision may be imposed by the department consistent with all of the following:

(1) The chief of enforcement issues a complaint to any person or entity on which an administrative penalty may be imposed pursuant to this section. The complaint shall allege the act or failure to act that constitutes a violation, relevant facts, the provision of law authorizing the administrative penalty to be imposed, and the proposed penalty amount.

(2) The complaint and order is served by personal notice or certified mail and informs the party served that
 the party may request a hearing no later than 20 days from the date of service. If a hearing is requested, it shall be scheduled before the director or his or her designee, which designee shall not be the chief of enforcement issuing the complaint and order. A request for hearing shall contain a brief statement of the material facts the party claims support his or her contention that an administrative penalty should not be imposed or that an administrative penalty of a lesser amount is warranted. A party served with a complaint pursuant to this subdivision waives the right to a hearing if no hearing is requested within 20 days of service of the complaint, in which case the order imposing the administrative penalty shall become final.

(3) The director, or his or her designee, shall control the nature and order of the hearing proceedings. Hearings shall be informal in nature, and need not be conducted according to the technical rules relating to
 evidence. The director, or his or her designee, shall issue a final order within 45 days of the close of the hearing. A final copy of the order shall be served by certified mail upon the party served with the complaint.

(4) A party may obtain review of the final order by filing a petition for a writ of mandate with the superior court within 30 days of the date of service of the final order. The administrative penalty shall be due and payable to the department within 60 days after the time to seek judicial review has expired or, where the party has not requested a hearing of the order, within 20 days after the order imposing an administrative penalty becomes final.

(g) For any conviction or other entry of judgment imposed by a court for a violation of this section resulting in a fine, the court may pay one-half of the fine, but not to exceed five hundred dollars ($500), to any
 person giving information that led to the conviction or other entry of judgment. This reward shall not apply if the informant is a regular salaried law enforcement officer, or officer or agent of the department.

(h) Upon conviction or other entry of judgment for a violation of this section, any seized ivory or rhinoceros horn shall be forfeited and, upon forfeiture, either maintained by the department for educational or training purposes, donated by the department to a bona fide educational or scientific institution, or destroyed.

(i) Administrative penalties collected pursuant to this section shall be deposited in the Fish and Game Preservation Fund and used for law enforcement purposes upon appropriation by the Legislature.

(j) This section does not preclude enforcement under Section 653o of the Penal
 Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 86, Sec. 135.   (SB 1171)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

2023.

(a) For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:

(1) “Fur” means any animal skin or part thereof with hair, fleece, or fur fibers attached thereto, either in its raw or processed state.

(2) (A) “Fur product” means any article of clothing or covering for any part of the body, or any fashion accessory, including, but not limited to, handbags, shoes, slippers, hats, earmuffs, scarves, shawls, gloves, jewelry, keychains, toys or trinkets, and home accessories and decor, that is made in whole or in part of fur.

(B) “Fur
 product” does not include any of the following:

(i) A dog or cat fur product, as defined in Section 1308 of Title 19 of the United States Code, as that section read on January 1, 2020.

(ii) An animal skin or part thereof that is to be converted into leather, which in processing will have the hair, fleece, or fur fiber completely removed.

(iii) Cowhide with hair attached thereto.

(iv) Deerskin, sheepskin, or goatskin with hair attached thereto.

(v) The pelt or skin of an animal that is preserved through taxidermy.

(vi) A product made pursuant to Section 3087 or 4303. 

(3) “Taxidermy” means the practice of preparing, stuffing, and mounting the skin, in lifelike form, of any fish, reptile, amphibian, bird, or mammal.

(4) “Ultimate consumer” means a person who buys for their own use, or for the use of another, but not for resale or trade.

(5) “Used fur product” means fur in any form that has been worn or used by an ultimate consumer.

(b) (1) It is unlawful to sell, offer for sale, display for sale, trade, or
 otherwise distribute for monetary or nonmonetary consideration a fur product in the state.

(2) It is unlawful to manufacture a fur product in the state for
 sale.

(c) The prohibitions set forth in subdivision (b) do not apply to any of the following:

(1) A used fur product.

(2) A fur product used for religious purposes.

(3) A fur product used for traditional tribal, cultural, or spiritual purposes by a member of a federally recognized Native American tribe or a nonfederally recognized California Native American tribe listed on the California Tribal Consultation List maintained by the Native American Heritage Commission.

(4) Any activity expressly authorized by federal law.

(d) A person who sells or trades any used fur product or fur product described in subdivision (c) shall maintain a record of each sale or trade of one of those exempt fur products for at least one year. A person who reports the receipt or purchase of a used fur product or fur product described in subdivision (c) pursuant to Section 21628 of the Business and Professions Code shall be deemed to satisfy this subdivision. A violation of this subdivision is not subject to a criminal or civil penalty.

(e) (1) A person who violates subdivision (b) may be
 subject to the following civil penalties:

(A) For the first violation and for a violation that does not meet the requirements of subparagraph (B) or (C), a civil penalty of up to five hundred dollars ($500).

(B) For a violation that occurred within one year of a previous violation, a civil penalty of up to seven hundred fifty dollars ($750).

(C) For a violation that occurred within one year of a second or subsequent violation, a civil penalty of up to one thousand dollars ($1,000).

(2) Each fur product that constitutes a violation of subdivision (b) shall be treated as a separate
 violation in a civil action brought pursuant to this section.

(f) (1) In lieu of seeking prosecution of a violation of subdivision (b) as a misdemeanor, the department, the Attorney General, or the city attorney of the city or the district attorney or county counsel of the county in which a violation of subdivision (b) occurs, may bring a civil action to recover the civil penalty in subdivision (e). The civil action shall be brought in the county in which the violation occurs and any penalty imposed shall be transferred to the Controller for deposit in the Fish and Game Preservation Fund in accordance with Section 13001 and
 used exclusively for the purposes described in Section 1771 and for the enforcement of this section. 

(2) In an action brought under this section, in addition to the penalty specified in subdivision (e), the reasonable costs of investigation, reasonable attorney’s fees, and reasonable expert witness’ fees may also be recovered and those amounts shall be credited to the same operating funds as those from which the expenditures for those purposes were derived. 

(g) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2023.

(h) The provisions of this section are severable. If any provision of
 this section or its application is held invalid, that invalidity shall not affect other provisions or applications that can be given effect without the invalid provision or application.

(History: Added by Stats. 2019, Ch. 764, Sec. 1.   (AB 44)   Effective January 1, 2020.   Operative January 1, 2023, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

2024.

(a) The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:

(1) Illegal poaching of the state’s native plants is a threat to the state’s biodiversity, can put certain species at risk for extinction, and can negatively impact entire ecosystem functions.

(2) The illicit trade of live plants and animals is a multibillion dollar market responsible for the unwanted transmission of pests and diseases from one country to another.

(3) Dudleya poaching, specifically, has increased dramatically because they have become popular in many Southeast Asian countries,
 where a single plant can be sold for up to one thousand dollars ($1,000) on the black market. As a result, some poaching operations have been found to be in possession of thousands of dudleya taken from the state’s forests, mountains, and coastal bluffs.

(4) Some species of dudleya, which already face conservation challenges, such as habitat loss from development or altered wildfire regimes, are endemic to the state and their worldwide distribution is limited to a single county, island, or mountain range.

(5) Protecting dudleya populations from poaching activity is necessary to prevent the loss of species and to promote the conservation of the state’s biodiversity.

(b) For purposes of this section, “dudleya” means a
 succulent plant that belongs to the genus Dudleya and referred to commonly as “live-forevers” or “dudleya” that is native to California and grows in natural habitats.

(c) Except as provided in subdivision (e), it is unlawful to uproot, remove, harvest, or cut dudleya from land owned by the state or a local government or from property not their own without written permission from the landowner in their immediate possession.

(d) It is unlawful to sell, offer for sale, possess with intent to sell, transport for sale, export for sale, or purchase dudleya uprooted, removed, harvested, or cut in violation of subdivision (c).

(e) A person who holds a license or permit pursuant to Section 1002 may take dudleya
 consistent with that license or permit.

(f) Notwithstanding Section 12000, for a violation of this section, or any rule, regulation, or order adopted pursuant to this section, the following criminal penalties shall be imposed:

(1) For a first conviction, where the total value is two hundred fifty dollars ($250) or more, the offense shall be a misdemeanor punishable by a fine of not less than five thousand dollars ($5,000) and not more than fifty thousand dollars ($50,000), imprisonment in the county jail for not more than 
 six months, or by both the fine and imprisonment.

(2) For a second or subsequent conviction, the offense shall be a misdemeanor punishable by a fine of not less than ten thousand dollars ($10,000) and not more than five hundred thousand dollars, ($500,000), imprisonment in the county jail for not more than six months, or by both the fine and imprisonment.

(g) In addition to, and separate from, any criminal
 penalty provided for under subdivision (f), where applicable, the cost of replanting any dudleya forfeited pursuant to subdivision (h), may be imposed by the court.

(h) Upon conviction or other entry of judgment for a violation of this section, any seized dudleya shall be forfeited to the department.

(i) Notwithstanding Section 802 of the Penal Code, prosecution of an offense punishable under this section shall be commenced within three years after commission of the offense.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 370, Sec. 1.   (AB 223)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 1.5. Endangered Species [2050. - 2089.25.]



  ARTICLE 1. General Provisions [2050. - 2068.]

2050.

This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the California Endangered Species Act.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1240, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

2051.

The Legislature hereby finds and declares all of the following:

(a) Certain species of fish, wildlife, and plants have been rendered extinct as a consequence of man’s activities, untempered by adequate concern and conservation.

(b) Other species of fish, wildlife, and plants are in danger of, or threatened with, extinction because their habitats are threatened with destruction, adverse modification, or severe curtailment, or because of overexploitation, disease, predation, or other factors.

(c) These species of fish, wildlife, and plants are of ecological, educational, historical, recreational, esthetic, economic, and scientific value to the people of this state, and the conservation, protection, and enhancement of these species and their habitat is of statewide concern.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1240, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

2052.

The Legislature further finds and declares that it is the policy of the state to conserve, protect, restore, and enhance any endangered species or any threatened species and its habitat and that it is the intent of the Legislature, consistent with conserving the species, to acquire lands for habitat for these species.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1240, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

2052.1.

The Legislature further finds and declares that if any provision of this chapter requires a person to provide mitigation measures or alternatives to address a particular impact on a candidate species, threatened species, or endangered species, the measures or alternatives required shall be roughly proportional in extent to any impact on those species that is caused by that person. Where various measures or alternatives are available to meet this obligation, the measures or alternatives required shall maintain the person’s objectives to the greatest extent possible consistent with this section. All required measures or alternatives shall be capable of successful implementation. This section governs the full extent of mitigation measures or alternatives that may be imposed on a person pursuant to this chapter. This section shall not affect the state’s obligations set forth in Section 2052.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 485, Sec. 74.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

2053.

(a) The Legislature further finds and declares that it is the policy of the state that public agencies should not approve projects as proposed which would jeopardize the continued existence of any endangered species or threatened species or result in the destruction or adverse modification of habitat essential to the continued existence of those species, if there are reasonable and prudent alternatives available consistent with conserving the species or its habitat which would prevent jeopardy.

(b) Furthermore, it is the policy of this state and the intent of the Legislature that reasonable and prudent alternatives shall be developed by the department, together with the project proponent and the state lead agency, consistent
 with conserving the species, while at the same time maintaining the project purpose to the greatest extent possible.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 329, Sec. 1.   (SB 473)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

2054.

The Legislature further finds and declares that, in the event specific economic, social, or other conditions make infeasible such alternatives, individual projects may be approved if appropriate mitigation and enhancement measures are provided.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1240, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

2055.

The Legislature further finds and declares that it is the policy of this state that all state agencies, boards, and commissions shall seek to conserve endangered species and threatened species and shall utilize their authority in furtherance of the purposes of this chapter.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1240, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

2056.

The Legislature further finds and declares that the cooperation of the owners of land which is identified as habitat for endangered species and threatened species is essential for the conservation of those species and that it is the policy of this state to foster and encourage that cooperation in furtherance of the purposes of this chapter. Therefore, a landowner of property on which an endangered, threatened, or candidate species lives shall not be liable for civil damages for injury to employees of, or persons under contract with, the department if the injury occurs while those persons are conducting survey, management, or recovery efforts with respect to those species.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1987, Ch. 286, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

2060.

The definitions in this article govern the construction of this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1240, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

2061.

“Conserve,” “conserving,” and “conservation” mean to use, and the use of, all methods and procedures which are necessary to bring any endangered species or threatened species to the point at which the measures provided pursuant to this chapter are no longer necessary. These methods and procedures include, but are not limited to, all activities associated with scientific resources management, such as research, census, law enforcement, habitat acquisition, restoration and maintenance, propagation, live trapping, and transplantation, and, in the extraordinary case where population pressures within a given ecosystem cannot be otherwise relieved, may include regulated taking.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1240, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

2062.

“Endangered species” means a native species or subspecies of a bird, mammal, fish, amphibian, reptile, or plant which is in serious danger of becoming extinct throughout all, or a significant portion, of its range due to one or more causes, including loss of habitat, change in habitat, overexploitation, predation, competition, or disease. Any species determined by the commission as “endangered” on or before January 1, 1985, is an “endangered species.”

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1240, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

2063.

“Feasible” means feasible as defined in Section 21061.1 of the Public Resources Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1240, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

2064.

“Project” means project as defined in Section 21065 of the Public Resources Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1240, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

2064.5.

“Recover” and “recovery” mean to improve, and improvement in, the status of a species to the point at which listing is no longer appropriate under the criteria set out in this chapter and any regulations adopted thereunder, and, if the department has approved a recovery plan, satisfaction of the conditions of that plan.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 329, Sec. 2.   (SB 473)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

2065.

“State lead agency” means the state agency, board, or commission which is a lead agency under the California Environmental Quality Act (Division 13 (commencing with Sec. 21000) of the Public Resources Code).

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1240, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

2067.

“Threatened species” means a native species or subspecies of a bird, mammal, fish, amphibian, reptile, or plant that, although not presently threatened with extinction, is likely to become an endangered species in the foreseeable future in the absence of the special protection and management efforts required by this chapter. Any animal determined by the commission as “rare” on or before January 1, 1985, is a “threatened species.”

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1240, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

2068.

“Candidate species” means a native species or subspecies of a bird, mammal, fish, amphibian, reptile, or plant that the commission has formally noticed as being under review by the department for addition to either the list of endangered species or the list of threatened species, or a species for which the commission has published a notice of proposed regulation to add the species to either list.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1240, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Listing of Endangered Species [2070. - 2079.1.]

2070.

The commission shall establish a list of endangered species and a list of threatened species. The commission shall add or remove species from either list if it finds, upon the receipt of sufficient scientific information pursuant to this article, and based solely upon the best available scientific information, that the action is warranted.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 329, Sec. 4.   (SB 473)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

2071.

The commission shall adopt guidelines by which an interested person may petition the commission to add a species to, or to remove a species from either the list of endangered or the list of threatened species.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1162, Sec. 6.)
-------------------------------------------

2071.5.

The department shall recommend, and the commission shall adopt, criteria for determining if a species is endangered or threatened.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1162, Sec. 6.)
-------------------------------------------

2072.

The petition shall be written, shall be clearly identified as a petition, and shall clearly indicate the administrative measure recommended.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1162, Sec. 6.)
-------------------------------------------

2072.3.

To be accepted, a petition shall, at a minimum, include sufficient scientific information that a petitioned action may be warranted. Petitions shall include information regarding the population trend, range, distribution, abundance, and life history of a species, the factors affecting the ability of the population to survive and reproduce, the degree and immediacy of the threat, the impact of existing management efforts, suggestions for future management, and the availability and sources of information. The petition shall also include information regarding the kind of habitat necessary for species survival, a detailed distribution map, and any other factors that the petitioner deems relevant.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1162, Sec. 6.)
-------------------------------------------

2072.7.

The department may, in the absence of a petition from an interested party, recommend to the commission that it add a species to, or remove a species from, either the list of endangered species or the list of threatened species. If it makes a recommendation under this section, the department shall include the information specified in Section 2072.3. A department recommendation under this section shall be considered by the commission as a petition with a departmental recommendation to accept and consider as described in subdivision (b) of Section 2073.5, and is subject to Sections 2074 to 2079, inclusive.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1162, Sec. 6.)
-------------------------------------------

2073.

Within 10 days of the receipt of a petition from an interested person under Section 2072.3, the commission shall refer the petition to the department.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1162, Sec. 6.)
-------------------------------------------

2073.3.

(a) The commission shall publish a notice in the California Regulatory Notice Register of the receipt of a petition prepared pursuant to Section 2072.3 by the department, or by an interested party and referred to the department, pursuant to Section 2073, or the commencement of an evaluation, to add a species to, remove a species from, or change the status of a species on, the list of endangered species or the list of threatened species pursuant to Section 2072.7. At a minimum, the notice shall include all of the following:

(1) The scientific and common name of the species. 

(2) Habitat type, if that information is available in the petition. 

(3) The location where interested persons can submit information to the department relating to the petitioned species.

(b) The commission shall notify interested persons pursuant to Section 2078, by mail, of the notices prepared pursuant to subdivision (a), and shall mail a copy of the notice to those persons.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1997, Ch. 515, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

2073.4.

(a) A person may submit information to the department relating to the petitioned species during the evaluation of the petition pursuant to Section 2073.5. The information shall relate to the matters identified in Section 2072.3.

(b) Within 30 days after receiving information pursuant to subdivision (a), the department shall notify the petitioner regarding its content.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 329, Sec. 5.   (SB 473)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

2073.5.

(a) Within 90 days of receipt of the petition, the department shall evaluate the petition on its face and in relation to other relevant information the department possesses or receives, and submit to the commission its written evaluation report with one of the following recommendations to the commission:

(1) Based upon the information contained in the petition, there is not sufficient information to indicate that the petitioned action may be warranted, and the petition should be rejected.

(2) Based upon the information contained in the petition, there is sufficient information to indicate that the petitioned action may be warranted, and the petition should be accepted and considered.

(b) Upon the request of the director, the commission may grant the department an extension of time, not to exceed 30 days, to allow the department additional time to further analyze and evaluate the petition and complete its evaluation report.

(c) The department’s evaluation report shall include copies of, or a list of, all information submitted to the department pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 2073.4 during its evaluation of the petition. If copies are not included, the report shall state where the listed information is available for review.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1997, Ch. 515, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

2073.7.

A petitioner may amend a petition at any time prior to the beginning of the meeting held by the commission pursuant to Section 2074.2. However, if the commission determines that the amendment is substantive, the commission shall resubmit the petition to the department for review pursuant to Section 2073.5, publish notice of the amendment pursuant to Section 2073.3, and renotice or continue any hearing scheduled pursuant to Section 2074 in order to provide adequate opportunity for public comment.

(History: Added by Stats. 1997, Ch. 515, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

2074.

The commission shall schedule the petition for consideration at its next available meeting, but not sooner than 30 days after receipt of the petition and public release of the evaluation report, and distribute its pending agenda to interested persons pursuant to Section 2078. The commission also shall make the petition, evaluation report, and other materials received available for review.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1997, Ch. 515, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

2074.2.

(a) At the meeting scheduled pursuant to Section 2074, the commission shall hold a public hearing on the petition and shall receive information, written or otherwise, and oral testimony. After the conclusion of oral testimony from the commission and department staff, the petitioner, or any other persons, the commission may close the public hearing and administrative record for the commission’s decision pursuant to this section.

(b) After the commission closes the public hearing, the administrative record for the commission’s decision is closed and it shall not be reopened except as provided in subdivision (c). Once the public hearing is closed, no person shall submit further information to the commission for consideration
 on that petition and the commission shall not accept any further information for consideration on that petition except as provided in subdivision (c).

(c) The administrative record for the commission’s decision pursuant to this section shall not be reopened once the commission closes the public hearing unless one of the following occurs prior to the commission’s decision:

(1) There is a change in state or federal law or regulation that has a direct and significant impact on the commission’s determination as to whether the petition provides sufficient information to indicate that the petitioned action may be warranted.

(2) The commission determines that it requires further information to evaluate whether the petition provides sufficient information to indicate that the petitioned action may be warranted. If the
 commission makes that determination during its deliberation, the commission may request, on the record at the scheduled meeting or at a continued meeting, further information on any issue relevant to making its determination as to whether the petition provides sufficient information to indicate that the petitioned action may be warranted. Any request by the commission pursuant to this paragraph shall specify a date by which the information must be submitted to the commission and shall serve to reopen the administrative record for the limited purpose of receiving further information relating to the issues specified by the commission in the request. Commission and department staff, the petitioner, or any other person may submit information in response to a request pursuant to this paragraph. If the commission reopens the record pursuant to this paragraph, it shall provide an opportunity for public comment on the submitted information prior to the issuance of its decision.

(d) In its discretion, the commission may either close the public hearing and continue the meeting on the petition for the purpose of deliberation or continue both the public hearing and the meeting on the petition to a subsequent date, which shall be no later than 90 days after the meeting scheduled pursuant to Section 2074, and subject to applicable notice and agenda requirements. If the commission closes the public hearing but continues the meeting for the purpose of deliberation, a person shall not submit, and the commission shall not receive, further information relating to the petition except as provided in subdivision (c).

(e) At the meeting scheduled pursuant to Section 2074 or at a continued meeting scheduled pursuant to subdivision (d), the commission shall consider the petition, the department’s written report, written comments received, and oral testimony provided during
 the public hearing, and the commission shall make and enter in its record one of the following findings:

(1) If the commission finds that the petition does not provide sufficient information to indicate that the petitioned action may be warranted, the commission shall publish a notice of finding that the petition is rejected, including the reasons why the petition is not sufficient.

(2) If the commission finds that the petition provides sufficient information to indicate that the petitioned action may be warranted, the commission shall publish a notice of finding that the petition is accepted for consideration. If the accepted petition recommends the addition of a species to either the list of endangered species or the list of threatened species, the commission shall include in the notice that the petitioned species is a candidate species. The commission shall maintain a list of
 species which are candidate species.

(f) The commission shall publish and distribute the findings relating to the petition pursuant to Section 2078.

(History: Amended (as amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 387, Sec. 3) by Stats. 2016, Ch. 201, Sec. 1.   (AB 2549)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

2074.4.
